Indiana, session 2026, HB1220.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 15-20-5.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 5.5. Cat Declawing
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "cat" means an animal of the
species Felis catus.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "declawing" means an
onychectomy or any other surgical procedure to:
(1) amputate; or
(2) modify;
a portion of a cat's paw in order to remove the cat's claws.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "tendonectomy" means a
procedure in which the tendons to a cat's:
(1) limbs;
(2) paws; or
(3) toes;
are cut or modified so that the normal functioning of the claws is
2026 IN 1220—LS 6298/DI 150


impaired.
Sec. 4. (a) As used in this chapter, "therapeutic purpose" means
a medically necessary procedure to address an existing or
recurring infection, disease, injury, or abnormal condition in a
cat's:
(1) claws;
(2) nail bed; or
(3) toe bone;
that jeopardizes the cat's health.
(b) The term does not include a procedure performed for a
cosmetic or aesthetic purpose or to make the cat more convenient
to keep or handle.
Sec. 5. (a) A person shall not perform:
(1) surgical claw removal;
(2) declawing; or
(3) a tendonectomy;
on a cat or otherwise alter a cat's toes, claws, or paws to prevent or
impair the normal function of the cat's toes, claws, or paws.
(b) This section does not apply to a procedure performed solely
for a therapeutic purpose.
(c) A person who violates this section is subject to a civil penalty
of:
(1) five hundred dollars ($500) for the first violation;
(2) one thousand dollars ($1,000) for the second violation; and
(3) two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for the third
and any subsequent violation.
(d) Civil penalties collected under this section must be deposited
in the state general fund.
2026 IN 1220—LS 6298/DI 150